North Dakota, session 69, SB2306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 50-11.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Child care workforce recruitment and retention program - Incentive payment.
1. The department shall establish a child care workforce recruitment and retention
program to address child care workforce shortages. The department shall remit a
monthly incentive payment to each licensed early childhood services provider based
on the number of children allowed to receive early childhood services on the premise
under the license. The monthly payment is calculated at:
a. Fifty dollars per number of infants;
b. Thirty dollars per number of toddlers; and
c. Fifteen dollars per number of school-aged children.
2. Payments may be made when a provider submits information to the department on a
quarterly basis regarding the average number of enrolled children for the previous
three months. The department may suspend payments to a licensed early childhood
services provider if the provider's average number of enrolled children decreases by
twenty-five percent or more from the previous reporting period.
3. To be eligible to receive a payment under this section, a provider may not have
received a corrective action order in the previous three months.
Page No. 1 25.1068.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. Each provider receiving a payment under this section must submit an annual report to
the department regarding how the incentive payments received under this section
were used to directly address salary and benefit needs of child care workers.
Page No. 2 25.1068.02000